Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 11. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 47.30.870.
Transportation.

When a person is to be involuntarily committed to a facility, the department shall arrange, and is authorized to pay for, the person’s necessary transportation to the designated facility accompanied by appropriate persons and, if necessary, by a peace officer.
The department shall pay return transportation of a person, the person’s escorts, and, if necessary, a peace officer, after a determination that the person is not committable, at the end of a commitment period, or at the end of a voluntary stay at a treatment facility following an evaluation conducted in accordance with AS

47.30.715

.
When advisable, one or more relatives or friends shall be permitted to accompany the person. The department may pay necessary travel, housing, and meal expenses incurred by one relative or friend in accompanying the person if the department determines that the person’s best interests require that the person be accompanied by the relative or friend and the relative or friend is indigent.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981)

Sec. 47.30.875.
Residence; nonresident patients; interstate agreements.

The admission papers of a person who is admitted to a treatment facility under AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

must include a statement as to the person’s residence. The department may return a patient who is not a resident of the state to the state of the person’s residence with court approval if the person has been committed. If the state in which the person has residence does not accept the person as a patient, the person shall be treated as a resident of this state under the provisions of AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

.

To facilitate the return of nonresident patients the department may enter into a reciprocal agreement or compact with another state providing for the prompt return under appropriate supervision of residents of that state who are mentally ill. A mentally ill resident of this state who has been placed in a facility outside this state may be admitted with the approval of the department to a treatment facility in the state designated by the department. The department may enter into reciprocal agreements or contracts with another state providing for custody, care or treatment, or return of mentally ill residents of this state by the other state and for the custody and care or treatment of mentally ill residents of that state by this state on a reimbursable basis. A resident of this state who has been committed in another state and is returned in accordance with this section shall, within 72 hours of admission to the designated facility, be examined. After examination the mental health professional in charge shall release the person or shall petition for involuntary commitment as prescribed in AS

47.30.740

.

In taking action under (a) and (b) of this section, consideration shall be given to the best interests of the patient, particularly to the relationship of the patient to the patient’s family, legal guardian, or friends to maintain relationships and encourage visits beneficial to the patient.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981)

Sec. 47.30.880.
Interstate Compact on Mental Health ratified.

This state ratifies and adopts by reference “The Interstate Compact on Mental Health” consisting of 14 articles approved on September 30, 1955, by the Northeast State Governments Conference on Mental Health. The department is designated as compact administrator with full power to carry out the purpose of the compact and to adopt all necessary regulations to implement the compact.

History.

(§ 119(e) ch 87 SLA 1957; added by § 11 ch 127 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

47.30.180

. Renumbered in 1981.

Sec. 47.30.885.
Rights outside state.

Nothing in AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

alters or impairs the application or availability to a patient, while hospitalized in another state under contractual arrangements entered in accordance with AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

, of the rights, remedies, or safeguards provided by the laws of this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981)

Collateral references. —

53 Am. Jur. 2d, Mentally Impaired Persons, § 75 et seq.

Sec. 47.30.890.
Provision for personal needs upon discharge.

The department shall ensure that

a patient is not discharged from a treatment facility without suitable clothing; and

a discharged indigent patient is furnished

suitable transportation to the patient’s permanent residence in this state or to another suitable place at the discretion of the department; and

a reasonable amount of money to meet the patient’s immediate needs.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981)

Sec. 47.30.895.
Disposition of unclaimed property; recovery of personal property.

Those unclaimed articles of personal property that are covered by AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.260

and the unclaimed money in the custody of a treatment facility that belong to a patient who dies before discharge, or to a patient who leaves the hospital without authority, if unclaimed by the patient or the legal heirs or representatives of the patient within one year after the patient’s death or departure, shall be disposed of in accordance with AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

, and the other articles of the patient’s personal property shall be disposed of in the manner prescribed by the department and the proceeds deposited in the general fund.

If a mentally ill individual has died in a foreign facility and the department desires to recover the patient’s personal property under this section, the commissioner or the commissioner’s designated representative may secure the property and for that purpose only is designated the decedent’s administrator. Property so recovered shall be disposed of as provided by law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 13 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Sec. 47.30.900.
Diligent inquiry; personal property delivery and claims.

The department shall make diligent inquiry in every instance after departure without authority or death of a patient, to ascertain the whereabouts of the patient or that of the patient’s legal heirs or representatives, and shall turn over to the proper person the money or articles of personal property in the custody of the facility to the credit of the patient. Claims to the money or articles of personal property, including claims by the state, may be presented to the department at any time.
If a claim other than by the state is established by clear and convincing evidence more than one year after the death or departure without authority of a patient, it shall be certified to the legislature for consideration and the legislature may pay the claim.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981)

Sec. 47.30.905.
Fees and expenses for judicial proceedings.

The witnesses, expert witnesses, and the jury in commitment proceedings under AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

are entitled to the fees, compensation, and mileage established by the administrative rules of court for other jurors and witnesses. Compensation, mileage, fees, transportation expenses for a respondent, and other expenses arising from evaluation and commitment proceedings shall be audited and allowed by the superior court of the judicial district in which the proceedings are held. To the extent that services of a peace officer are used to carry out the provisions of AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

, the officer is entitled to fees and actual expenses from the same source and in the same manner as for the officer’s other official duties.

An attorney appointed for a person under AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

shall be compensated for services as follows:

the person for whom an attorney is appointed shall, if the person is financially able under standards as to financial capability and indigency set by the court, pay the costs of the legal services;

if the person is indigent under those standards, the costs of the services shall be paid by the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981)

Sec. 47.30.907.
Report to Department of Public Safety.

Notwithstanding AS

47.30.845

, when a superior court orders the involuntary commitment of a person under AS

47.30.735

—

47.30.755

or when relief from a disability resulting from an involuntary commitment or an adjudication of mental illness or mental incompetence is granted under AS

47.30.851(b)

, the court shall immediately transmit the following information, if known, to the Department of Public Safety:

the person’s

name, date of birth, and address;

aliases;

social security number;

driver’s license or state identification card number;

the date of the order and whether the order is

an involuntary commitment; or

relief from the disability resulting from an involuntary commitment or an adjudication of mental illness or mental incompetence;

the statutory authority for the involuntary commitment or the disability resulting from an involuntary commitment or an adjudication of mental illness or mental incompetence;

whether the person was offered an opportunity to be heard and represented by counsel in the involuntary commitment proceeding or adjudication of mental illness or mental incompetence; and

any other information required by the Department of Public Safety or by the United States Department of Justice for inclusion in the National Instant Criminal Background Check System established under P.L. 103-159, 107 Stat. 1536 (Brady Handgun Violence Prevention Act).

This section does not apply to initial involuntary commitment procedures, emergency detention for evaluation, or hospitalization for examination under AS

47.30.700

—

47.30.715

if the person is released under AS

47.30.720

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 73 SLA 2014)

Effective dates. —

Section 5, ch. 73, SLA 2014, which enacted this section, took effect on October 8, 2014.

Sec. 47.30.910.
Payment of patient expenses.

A patient, the patient’s spouse, or the patient’s parent if the patient is under 18 years of age shall pay the charges for the care, transportation, and treatment of the patient when the patient is hospitalized under AS

47.30.670

—

47.30.915

at a state-operated facility, an evaluation facility, or a designated treatment facility providing services under AS

47.30.670

—

47.30.915

. The patient, the patient’s spouse, or the patient’s parent if the patient is under 18 years of age shall make arrangements with a state-operated facility, an evaluation facility, or a designated treatment facility for payment of charges, including providing income information necessary to determine eligibility for benefits under AS 47.31. Charges assessed for services provided under AS 47.30.670 — 47.30.915 when a patient is hospitalized at a state-operated facility may not exceed the actual cost of care and treatment. The department may, when assessing charges for services provided at a state-operated facility, consider the ability to pay of a patient, a patient’s spouse, or a patient’s parent if the patient is under 18 years of age. In order to impose liability for a patient’s cost of care at a state-operated facility, the department shall issue an order for payment within six months after the date on which the charge was incurred. The order remains in effect unless modified by subsequent court order or department order. The department may not impose liability for a patient’s cost of care at a state-operated facility if the patient would otherwise meet the eligibility criteria, other than location of service, in AS

47.31.010

.

The department, the evaluation facility, or a designated treatment facility shall make reasonable efforts to determine whether the patient, the patient’s spouse, or the patient’s parent if the patient is under 18 years of age has a third-party payor or has the available means to substantially contribute to the payment of charges, or whether the patient is eligible for assistance under AS 47.31.

If a patient is hospitalized at a state-operated facility and the patient, the patient’s spouse, or the patient’s parent if the patient is under 18 years of age fails to provide to the department information necessary to determine whether there is a third-party payor or available means to substantially contribute to the payment of charges, or whether the patient would, if not hospitalized at a state-operated facility, be eligible for assistance under AS 47.31, the department may issue an administrative order imposing full liability for the patient’s actual cost of care on the patient, the patient’s spouse, or the patient’s parent if the patient is under 18 years of age. The order remains in effect unless modified by subsequent court order or department order.

If a person who is hospitalized under AS

47.30.670

—

47.30.915

at an evaluation facility or a designated treatment facility cannot pay or substantially contribute to the payment of charges described under this section, the patient may apply for assistance under AS 47.31.

The department may charge or accept money or property from a person for the care or treatment of a patient at a state-operated facility.

Money paid by the patient or on the patient’s behalf to the department under this section shall be deposited in the general fund.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 95 ch 138 SLA 1986; am §§ 41, 42 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991; am § 36 ch 5 FSSLA 1994; am § 1 ch 87 SLA 1999)

Editor’s notes. —

The delayed amendment of this section by § 2, ch. 87, SLA 1999, which was to take effect July 1, 2001, was repealed by § 1, ch. 59, SLA 2001.

Collateral references. —

Constitutionality of statute imposing liability upon estate of relative of insane person for his support in asylum. 20 ALR3d 363.

Sec. 47.30.915.
Definitions.

In AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

,

“adjudication of mental illness or mental incompetence” means a court order finding that a person is

not guilty by reason of insanity or guilty but mentally ill under AS

12.47.040

;

incompetent to stand trial for a criminal offense under AS

12.47.100

—

12.47.120

; or

a danger to self or others, or is gravely disabled because of incapacity, incompetence, mental illness, dementia, or some other cause;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of health and social services;

“court” means a superior court of the state;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“designated treatment facility” or “treatment facility” means a hospital, clinic, institution, center, or other health care facility that has been designated by the department for the treatment or rehabilitation of mentally ill persons under AS

47.30.670

—

47.30.915

but does not include correctional institutions;

“disability resulting from an involuntary commitment or an adjudication of mental illness or mental incompetence” means the prohibition against the possession of a firearm or ammunition under 18 U.S.C. 922(g)(4) that results from an involuntary commitment or adjudication of mental illness or mental incompetence;

“evaluation facility” means a health care facility that has been designated or is operated by the department to perform the evaluations described in AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

, or a medical facility licensed under AS 47.32 or operated by the federal government;

“evaluation personnel” means mental health professionals designated by the department to conduct evaluations as prescribed in AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

who conduct evaluations in places in which no staffed evaluation facility exists;

“gravely disabled” means a condition in which a person as a result of mental illness

is in danger of physical harm arising from such complete neglect of basic needs for food, clothing, shelter, or personal safety as to render serious accident, illness, or death highly probable if care by another is not taken; or

will, if not treated, suffer or continue to suffer severe and abnormal mental, emotional, or physical distress, and this distress is associated with significant impairment of judgment, reason, or behavior causing a substantial deterioration of the person’s previous ability to function independently;

“inpatient treatment” means care and treatment rendered inside or on the premises of a treatment facility, or a part or unit of a treatment facility, for a continual period of 24 hours or longer;

“least restrictive alternative” means mental health treatment facilities and conditions of treatment that

are no more harsh, hazardous, or intrusive than necessary to achieve the treatment objectives of the patient; and

involve no restrictions on physical movement nor supervised residence or inpatient care except as reasonably necessary for the administration of treatment or the protection of the patient or others from physical injury;

“likely to cause serious harm” means a person who

poses a substantial risk of bodily harm to that person’s self, as manifested by recent behavior causing, attempting, or threatening that harm;

poses a substantial risk of harm to others as manifested by recent behavior causing, attempting, or threatening harm, and is likely in the near future to cause physical injury, physical abuse, or substantial property damage to another person; or

manifests a current intent to carry out plans of serious harm to that person’s self or another;

“mental health professional” means a psychiatrist or physician who is licensed by the State Medical Board to practice in this state or is employed by the federal government; a clinical psychologist licensed by the state Board of Psychologist and Psychological Associate Examiners; a psychological associate trained in clinical psychology and licensed by the Board of Psychologist and Psychological Associate Examiners; an advanced practice registered nurse or a registered nurse with a master’s degree in psychiatric nursing, licensed by the State Board of Nursing; a marital and family therapist licensed by the Board of Marital and Family Therapy; a professional counselor licensed by the Board of Professional Counselors; a clinical social worker licensed by the Board of Social Work Examiners; and a person who

has a master’s degree in the field of mental health;

has at least 12 months of post-masters working experience in the field of mental illness; and

is working under the supervision of a type of licensee listed in this paragraph;

“mental illness” means an organic, mental, or emotional impairment that has substantial adverse effects on an individual’s ability to exercise conscious control of the individual’s actions or ability to perceive reality or to reason or understand; intellectual disability, developmental disability, or both, epilepsy, drug addiction, and alcoholism do not per se constitute mental illness, although persons suffering from these conditions may also be suffering from mental illness;

“peace officer” includes a state police officer, municipal or other local police officer, state, municipal, or other local health officer, public health nurse, United States marshal or deputy United States marshal, or a person authorized by the court;

“persons with mental disorders” has the meaning given in AS

47.30.610

;

“professional person in charge” means the senior mental health professional at a facility or that person’s designee; in the absence of a mental health professional it means the chief of staff or a physician designated by the chief of staff;

“provider of outpatient care” means a mental health professional or hospital, clinic, institution, center, or other health care facility designated by the department to accept for treatment patients who are ordered to undergo involuntary outpatient treatment by the court or who are released early from inpatient commitments on condition that they undergo outpatient treatment;

“screening investigation” means the investigation and review of facts that have been alleged to warrant emergency examination or treatment, including interviews with the persons making the allegations, any other significant witnesses who can readily be contacted for interviews, and, if possible, the respondent, and an investigation and evaluation of the reliability and credibility of persons providing information or making allegations;

“state” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the territories and possessions of the United States, and the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and, with the approval of the United States Congress, Canada.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am §§ 26 — 30 ch 142 SLA 1984; am § 43 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 3 ch 87 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 73 SLA 2002; am § 32 ch 57 SLA 2005; am § 25 ch 42 SLA 2013; am § 6 ch 73 SLA 2014; am § 53 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (14) (now (16)) was enacted as (18) and renumbered in 1991. Paragraphs (1) and (6) were enacted as paragraphs (19) and (20) and renumbered in 2014.
Reorganized in 1991 and 2014 to maintain alphabetical order.

In 2000, “Psychologist” was substituted for “Psychologists” in the definition of “mental health professional” to correct a manifest error.

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for designation of evaluation personnel, see 7 AAC 72, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 2, 2005, updated a section reference in paragraph (5).

The 2013 amendment, effective September 1, 2013, in (12), substituted “intellectual disability, developmental disability, or both” for “mental retardation”.

The 2014 amendment, effective October 8, 2014, added (19) [now (1)] and (20) [now (6)] and made related changes.

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (13), inserted “an advanced practice registered nurse or” following “Psychological Associate Examiners;”.

Editor’s notes. —

The delayed amendment of (4) of this section by § 4, ch. 87, SLA 1999, which was to take effect July 1, 2001, was repealed by § 1, ch. 59, SLA 2001.